Utah statutes.
17B-1-201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Applicable area" means:

(a)  for a county, the unincorporated area of the county that is included within the proposed local district; or

(b)  for a municipality, the area of the municipality that is included within the proposed local district.

(2)  "Governing body" means:

(a)  for a county or municipality, the legislative body of the county or municipality; and

(b)  for a local district, the board of trustees of the local district.

(3)  "Groundwater right owner petition" means a petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c).

(4)  "Groundwater right owner request" means a request under Section 17B-1-204 that is signed by owners of water rights as provided in Subsection 17B-1-204(2)(b)(ii).

(5)  "Initiating local district" means a local district that adopts a resolution proposing the creation of a local district under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(e).

(6)  "Petition" means a petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a), (b), or (c).

(7)  "Property owner petition" means a petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a).

(8)  "Property owner request" means a request under Section 17B-1-204 that is signed by owners of real property as provided in Subsection 17B-1-204(2)(b)(i).

(9)  "Registered voter request" means a request under Section 17B-1-204 that is signed by registered voters as provided in Subsection 17B-1-204(2)(b)(iii).

(10)  "Registered voter petition" means a petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(b).

(11)  "Request" means a request as described in Section 17B-1-204.

(12)  "Responsible body" means the governing body of:

(a)  the municipality in which the proposed local district is located, if the petition or resolution proposes the creation of a local district located entirely within a single municipality;

(b)  the county in which the proposed local district is located, if the petition or resolution proposes the creation of a local district located entirely within a single county and all or part of the proposed local district is located within:

(i)  the unincorporated part of the county; or

(ii)  more than one municipality within the county;

(c)  if the petition or resolution proposes the creation of a local district located within more than one county, the county whose boundaries include more of the area of the proposed local district than is included within the boundaries of any other county; or

(d)  the initiating local district, if a resolution proposing the creation of a local district is adopted under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(e).

(13)  "Responsible clerk" means the clerk of the county or the clerk or recorder of the municipality whose legislative body is the responsible body.

